Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-127
Bonds; premium paid by county; manner of paying.

Upon the execution and approval of the bonds upon which the county pays premium, the county board shall direct the county clerk to draw warrants upon the county treasurer in payment of such premiums against the general fund of the county, such warrants to be signed by the chairman of the county board, countersigned by the county clerk, and sealed with the county seal.

Laws 1905, c. 49, § 2, p. 295;

C.S.1913, § 5732;

C.S.1922, § 5061;

C.S.1929, § 12-125;

Laws 1941, c. 17, § 2, p. 102;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 12-125;

R.S.1943, § 11-127.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).